Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-336 Commingled goods. (a) In
this section, "commingled goods" means goods that are physically
united with other goods in such a manner that their identity is lost in a
product or mass.

(b) A security interest does not exist in
commingled goods as such. However, a security interest may attach to a product
or mass that results when goods become commingled goods.

(c) If collateral becomes commingled goods, a
security interest attaches to the product or mass.

(d) If a security interest in collateral is
perfected before the collateral becomes commingled goods, the security interest
that attaches to the product or mass under subsection (c) is perfected.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(f), the other provisions of this part determine the priority of a security
interest that attaches to the product or mass under subsection (c).

(f) If more than one security interest
attaches to the product or mass under subsection (c), the following rules
determine priority:

(1) A security interest that is perfected under
subsection (d) has priority over a security interest that is unperfected at the
time the collateral becomes commingled goods.

(2) If more than one security interest is perfected
under subsection (d), the security interests rank equally in proportion to
value of the collateral at the time it became commingled goods. [L 2000, c 241,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next